Washington statutes.
RCW 19.370.080

Applicability to investigations and notices.

Nothing in chapter 38, Laws of 2016 may be construed to prohibit a performing rights society from conducting investigations to determine the existence of music use by a proprietor's business or informing a proprietor of the proprietor's obligations under the copyright laws of the United States pursuant to Title 17 of the United States Code (17 U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.).

[ 2016 c 38 s 8.]